Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-313.5] Preferred repair
provider. An insurer may have a preferred repair provider program. All
insurers having such a program shall:

(1) Make appropriate rate filings with the insurance
commissioner to reflect the reduced premiums; and

(2) Offer a choice of no less than two preferred
repair providers to the claimant, if available. [L 1997, c 251, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next